nl: Verstelbaarheid van de zills-band: Verstelbaar; Vaste maat; Vervangbaar bandje/elastiek; Overig
pt-BR: Zills ajuste da tira: Ajustável; Tamanho fixo; Alça/elástico substituível; Outros
pl: Regulacja paska talerzyków zills: Regulowany; Rozmiar stały; Wymienny pasek/gumka; Inne
th: ความสามารถในการปรับสายรัดของ Zills: ปรับได้; ขนาดตายตัว; เปลี่ยนสาย/ยางยืดได้; อื่นๆ
ja: ジル用ストラップの調整機能: 調整可能; 固定サイズ; 交換可能なストラップ/ゴム; その他
ko: 질스 스트랩 조절 기능: 조절 가능; 고정 사이즈; 교체형 스트랩/밴드; 기타
ro-RO: Posibilitatea de ajustare a curelei pentru talgere: Ajustabil; Dimensiune fixă; Curea/bandă elastică înlocuibilă; Altele
sl-SI: Nastavljivost traku prstnih činel: Nastavljivo; Fiksna velikost; Zamenljiv pašček/elastika; Drugo
bg-BG: Регулируемост на лентата за зилове: Регулируем; Фиксиран размер; Сменяема каишка/ластик; Други
zh-CN: 指钹指带调节: 可调节; 固定尺寸; 可替换绑带/松紧带; 其他
vi: Khả năng điều chỉnh dây đeo của Zills: Có thể điều chỉnh; Kích thước cố định; Dây đeo/dây thun có thể thay thế; Khác
en: Zills strap adjustability: Adjustable; Fixed size; Replaceable strap/elastic; Other
it: Regolazione del cinturino dei cimbali: Regolabile; Misura fissa; Cinturino/elastico sostituibile; Altro
cs: Nastavitelnost pásku prstových činelů: Nastavitelné; Pevná velikost; Vyměnitelný popruh/gumička; Jiné
el: Δυνατότητα ρύθμισης του ιμάντα για τα ζίλια: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Σταθερό μέγεθος; Ανταλλακτικό λουράκι/λάστιχο; Άλλο
nb: Zill-stroppenes justerbarhet: Justerbar; Fast størrelse; Utskiftbar stropp/strikk; Annet
ru: Регулируемость ремешка зиллов: Регулируемый; Фиксированный размер; Сменный ремешок/резинка; Другое
hr-HR: Podešavanje Zills remena: Podesivo; Fiksna veličina; Zamjenjiva traka/elastika; Ostalo
de: Verstellbarkeit des Zimbelriemens: Verstellbar; Feste Größe; Austauschbarer Riemen/Gummizug; Sonstige
lt-LT: Zilų dirželio reguliuojamumas: Reguliuojamas; Fiksuoto dydžio; Keičiamas dirželis / elastikas; Kita
zh-TW: 指鈸綁帶可調整性): 可調式; 固定尺寸; 可替換綁帶/彈性材質; 其他
hu: Ujjcin pántjának állíthatósága: Állítható; Fix méret; Cserélhető pánt/gumi; Egyéb
es: Ajuste de la correa los címbalos: Ajustable; Tamaño fijo; Correa/elástico reemplazable; Otro
tr: Zills kayış ayarlanabilirliği: Ayarlanabilir; Sabit boyutlu; Değiştirilebilir kayış/lastik; Diğer
pt-PT: Ajustabilidade da correia dos pratos de dedo: Ajustável; Tamanho fixo; Alça amovível/elástico; Outro
fi: Sormisymbaalin nauhan säätömahdollisuus: Säädettävä; Kiinteä koko; Vaihdettava hihna/jousto; Muu
fr: Réglage de la sangle des sagattes: Réglable; Taille fixe; Sangle/élastique remplaçable; Autre
sk-SK: Možnosť nastavenia popruhu prstových činel: Nastaviteľné; Pevná veľkosť; Vymeniteľný remienok/gumička; Iné
sv: Zills – remjustering: Justerbar; Fast storlek; Utbytbar rem/resår; Övrigt
da: Justerbarhed for zills-strop: Justerbar; Fast størrelse; Udskiftelig strop/elastik; Andet